Montana, session 2025, SB169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 15-6-218, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-6-218. Intangible personal property exemption -- definition. (1) Intangible personal property is
exempt from taxation.
(2) (a) For the purposes of this section, "intangible personal property" means the following property
if it is not integral to the operation of a business or an operating unit of a centrally assessed utility: personal
property that is not tangible personal property and that:
(a) has no intrinsic value but is the representative or evidence of value, including but not limited to
(i) certificates of stock, ;
(ii) bonds, ;
(iii) promissory notes, ;
(iv) licenses, ;
(v) copyrights, ;
(vi) patents, ;
(vii) trademarks, ;
(viii) contracts, ;
(ix) software, ; and
(x) franchises; or
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 169

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 169.1
(b) lacks physical existence, including but not limited to goodwill.
(3) To the extent that the unit value of centrally assessed property includes intangible personal
property, that value must be removed from the unit value.
(b) The term does not include property used as an integral part of:
(i) the operation of a business; or
(ii) an operating unit of centrally assessed property."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to tax years beginning after December
31, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 169